Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2357, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2357. A. The withheld taxes and estimated taxes paid


shall be allowed as credits as provided by law.


B. 1. There shall be allowed as a credit against the tax


imposed by Section 2355 of this title the amount of tax paid another


state by a resident individual, as defined in paragraph 4 of Section


2353 of this title, upon income received as compensation for

Req. No. 2659 Page 1


personal services in such other state; provided, such credit shall


not be allowed with respect to any income specified in Section 114


of Title 4 of the United States Code, 4 U.S.C., Section 114, upon


which a state is prohibited from imposing an income tax. The credit


shall not exceed such proportion of the tax payable under Section


2355 of this title as the compensation for personal services subject


to tax in the other state and also taxable under Section 2355 of


this title bears to the Oklahoma adjusted gross income as defined in


paragraph 13 of Section 2353 of this title.


2. For tax years beginning after December 31, 2007 2008 through


2026, there shall be allowed to a resident individual or part-year


resident individual or nonresident individual member of the Armed


Forces of the United States as a credit against the tax imposed by


Section 2355 of this title twenty percent (20%) of the credit for


child care expenses allowed under the Internal Revenue Code of the


United States 1986, as amended, or five percent (5%) of the child


tax credit allowed under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, whichever amount is greater. Neither credit authorized by


this paragraph shall exceed the tax imposed by Section 2355 of this


title. The maximum child care credit allowable on the Oklahoma


income tax return shall be prorated on the ratio that Oklahoma


adjusted gross income bears to the federal adjusted gross income.


The credit authorized by this paragraph shall not be claimed by any


taxpayer if the federal adjusted gross income reflected on the

Req. No. 2659 Page 2


Oklahoma return for the taxpayer is in excess of One Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00).


3. For tax year 2027 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed to a resident individual or part-year resident individual or


nonresident individual member of the Armed Forces of the United


States as a credit against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of this


title twenty percent (20%) of the credit for child care expenses


allowed under 26 U.S.C., Section 21. The maximum child care credit


allowable on the Oklahoma income tax return shall be prorated on the


ratio that Oklahoma adjusted gross income bears to the federal


adjusted gross income. If the credit allowed pursuant to this


paragraph exceeds the tax imposed by Section 2355 of this title, the


excess amount shall be refunded to the taxpayer.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.410 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For tax year 2027 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, a credit for a resident individual or part-year


resident individual or nonresident individual member of the Armed


Forces of the United States who has a qualifying child as described


under 26 U.S.C., Section 152(c) who has not attained the age of


nineteen (19) years during the tax year.



Req. No. 2659 Page 3


B. The credit allowed shall be equal to Five Hundred Dollars


($500.00) per child for individual taxpayers with an adjusted gross


income of Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00) or less. For every


additional Ten Dollars ($10.00) of adjusted gross income above


Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00), the credit shall be reduced


by fifteen cents ($0.15). Taxpayers with an adjusted gross income


above One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) shall not be


eligible for the credit authorized by this section.


C. For taxpayers filing married filing separately, the adjusted


gross income of the taxpayer and the taxpayer’s spouse shall be


included for the purposes of the income thresholds and the


calculation of the credit amount, as provided in subsection B of


this section.


D. The maximum credit allowable, as provided in subsection B of


this section, shall be prorated on the ratio that Oklahoma adjusted


gross income bears to the federal adjusted gross income of the


taxpayer.


E. If the credit exceeds the tax imposed by Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the excess amount shall be


refunded to the taxpayer.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2659 QD 12/30/2025 10:06:22 PM



Req. No. 2659 Page 4